Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-19] Plans for part-time, temporary,
and seasonal or casual employees. (a) The board may offer medical,
hospital, or surgical benefits plans to part-time, temporary, and seasonal or
casual employees at no cost to the employers. The board may determine
eligibility for part-time, temporary, and seasonal or casual employees by rules
exempt from chapter 91 as provided in section 87A-26.

(b) The board shall establish the medical,
hospital, or surgical benefits plan or plans, which shall be exempt from the
minimum group requirements of article 10A of chapter 431. The medical,
hospital, or surgical benefits plan or plans shall provide, pay for, arrange
for, or reimburse the cost of medical, hospital, or surgical services, and may
include prescribed hospital in-patient and out-patient service and medical
benefits.

(c) The board may contract for the medical,
hospital, or surgical benefits plan or plans. Each part-time, temporary, and
seasonal or casual employee enrolled for medical, hospital, or surgical
benefits shall pay monthly contributions directly to the board's designated
carriers. The monthly contributions may include the carrier's administrative
costs. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next